Washington statutes.
RCW 16.60.064

Impeachment of assessment—Damages.

Upon the trial of any cause occurring under the provisions of RCW 16.60.010 through 16.60.076, the defendant may impeach any such assessment, and in that case the court or the jury shall determine the damages.

[Code 1881 s 2498; 1873 p 449 s 11; 1871 p 66 s 11; 1869 p 326 s 11; RRS s 5451.]